Illinois, session 104th, SB1401.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $6,000,000, or so much of that amount 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Human Services for a grant to the 7Neighborhood Housing Services of Chicago for costs associated 8with funding equitable mortgage lending, homeownership 9rehabilitation and development, and homebuyer subsidies and 10support.  11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 122025.